test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-3lex_kooidas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# â stems


  Adjective - kooidâs: # â-stems KOOIDAS
    kooidâs+A+Sg+Nom: kooidâs
    kooidâs+A+Attr: koidâ
    kooidâs+A+Sg+Gen: koidâs
    kooidâs+A+Sg+Acc: koidâs
    kooidâs+A+Sg+Ill: koidâsân
    kooidâs+A+Sg+Loc: koidâsist
    kooidâs+A+Sg+Com: koidâsáin
    kooidâs+A+Sg+Abe: koidâsttáá
    kooidâs+A+Ess: koidâsin
    kooidâs+A+Par: koidâsid
    kooidâs+A+Pl+Nom: koidâseh
    kooidâs+A+Pl+Gen: koidâsij
    kooidâs+A+Pl+Acc: koidâsijd
    kooidâs+A+Pl+Ill: koidâsáid
    kooidâs+A+Pl+Loc: koidâsijn
    kooidâs+A+Pl+Com: [koidâsijguin, koidâsijgijn]
    kooidâs+A+Pl+Abe: koidâsijttáá

    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: koidâsub
    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen: koidâsub
    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc: koidâsub
    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: koidâsuubon
    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc: koidâsubboost
    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com: koidâsubboin
    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Abe: koidâsubttáá
    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom: koidâsuboh
    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen: koidâsuboi
    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: koidâsuboid 
    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill: koidâsubboid
    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc: koidâsuboin
    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com: [koidâsuboiguin, koidâsuboigijn]
    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Abe: koidâsuboittáá
    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Ess: koidâsubbon
    kooidâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Par: koidâsubbod

    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: koidâsumos
    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: koidâsumos
    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Acc: koidâsumos
    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: koidâsumosân
    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Loc: koidâsumosist
    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com: koidâsumosáin
    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Abe: koidâsumosttáá
    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom: koidâsumoseh
    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen: koidâsumosij
    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc: koidâsumosijd
    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: koidâsumosáid
    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: koidâsumosijn
    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com: [koidâsumosijguin, koidâsumosijgijn]
    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Abe: koidâsumosijttáá
    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Ess: koidâsumosin
    kooidâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Par: koidâsumosid
